California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 order issued under this section to relinquish any firearms that the person owns or possesses pursuant to Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(3) Every person who owns, possesses, purchases, or receives, or attempts to purchase or receive a firearm or ammunition while subject to a protective order issued under this section is punishable pursuant to Section 29825 of the Penal Code.

(4) This subdivision does not apply in a case in which a protective order issued under this section was made solely on the basis of financial abuse or isolation unaccompanied by force, threat, harassment, intimidation, or any other form of abuse.

(v) In a proceeding brought under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), all of the
 following apply:

(1) Upon the filing of a petition for a protective order, the elder or dependent adult on whose behalf the petition has been filed shall receive a copy of the petition, a notice of the hearing, and any declarations submitted in support of the petition. The elder or dependent adult shall receive this information at least five days before the hearing. The court may, on motion of the petitioner or on its own motion, shorten the time for provision of this information to the elder or dependent adult.

(2) The adult protective services agency shall make reasonable efforts to assist the elder or dependent adult to attend the hearing
 in person or by remote means and provide testimony to the court, if that person wishes to do so. If the elder or dependent adult does not attend the hearing, the agency shall provide information to the court at the hearing regarding the reasons why the elder or dependent adult is not in attendance.

(3) Upon the filing of a petition for a protective order and upon issuance of an order granting the petition, the county adult protective services agency shall take all reasonable steps to provide for the safety of the elder or dependent adult, pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750), which may include, but are not limited to, facilitating the location of alternative accommodations for the elder or dependent adult, if needed.

(w) Commencing
 January 1, 2027, a party, representative of the county adult protective services agency, or witness may appear remotely at the hearing on a petition for a protective order under this section. The superior court of each county shall not charge a fee for any of these persons to appear remotely at the hearing and shall develop local rules and instructions for remote appearances permitted under this section, which shall be posted on its internet website. 

(x) Willful disobedience of a temporary restraining order or restraining order after hearing granted under this section is punishable pursuant to Section 273.6 of the Penal Code.

(y) This section does not apply to any action or proceeding governed by Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) of Part 4 of
 Division 3 of the Civil Code, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code. This section does not preclude a petitioner’s right to use other existing civil remedies.

(z) (1) The Judicial Council shall develop forms, instructions, and rules relating to matters governed by this section. The petition and response forms shall be simple and concise, and shall be used by parties in actions brought pursuant to this section.

(2) On or before February 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall revise or promulgate forms as necessary to implement the changes made by the act that added this paragraph.

(aa) When
 issuing a protective order pursuant to this section for abuse involving acts described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 15610.07, after notice and a hearing, the court may, if appropriate, also issue an order requiring the restrained party to participate in mandatory clinical counseling or anger management courses provided by a counselor, psychologist, psychiatrist, therapist, clinical social worker, or other mental or behavioral health professional licensed in the state to provide those services.

(ab) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, information regarding electronic filing and access to the superior court’s self-help center
 shall be prominently displayed on each superior court’s home page.

(2) Each self-help center shall maintain and make available information related to elder abuse restraining orders pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 267, Sec. 5.   (AB 561)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.04.

(a) The court shall order that any party enjoined pursuant to Section 15657.03 be prohibited from taking any action to obtain the address or location of any protected person, unless there is good cause not to make that order.

(b) The Judicial Council shall develop forms necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 572, Sec. 27.   (AB 1596)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 572.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.05.

Where it is proven by clear and convincing evidence that an individual is liable for abduction, as defined in Section 15610.06, in addition to all other remedies otherwise provided by law:

(a) (1) The court shall award to the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The term “costs” shall include, but is not limited to, costs of representing the abductee and his or her family in this state and any other state in any action related to the abduction and returning of the
 abductee to this state, as well as travel expenses for returning the abductee to this state and reasonable fees for the services of a conservator, if any, devoted to the litigation of a claim brought under this article.

(2) The award of attorney’s fees shall be governed by the principles set forth in Section 15657.1.

(b) The limitations imposed by Section 377.34 of the Code of Civil Procedure on the damages recoverable shall not apply. However, the damages recovered shall not exceed the damages permitted to be recovered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3333.2 of the Civil Code.

(c) The standards set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code regarding the imposition of punitive damages on an employer based upon the acts of an employee shall be satisfied before any damages or attorney’s fees
 permitted under this section may be imposed against an employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 663, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.1.

The award of attorney’s fees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15657 shall be based on all factors relevant to the value of the services rendered, including, but not limited to, the factors set forth in Rule 4-200 of the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar of California, and all of the following:

(a) The value of the abuse-related litigation in terms of the quality of life of the elder or dependent adult, and the results obtained.

(b) Whether the defendant took reasonable and timely steps to determine the likelihood and extent of liability. 

(c) The reasonableness and timeliness of any written offer in compromise made by a party to the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 23.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.2.

Notwithstanding this article, any cause of action for injury or damage against a health care provider, as defined in Section 340.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, based on the health care provider’s alleged professional negligence, shall be governed by those laws which specifically apply to those professional negligence causes of action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 774, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.3.

(a) The department of the superior court having jurisdiction over probate conservatorships shall also have concurrent jurisdiction over civil actions and proceedings involving a claim for relief arising out of the abduction, as defined in Section 15610.06, or the abuse of an elderly or dependent adult, if a conservator has been appointed for the plaintiff prior to the initiation of the action for abuse.

(b) The department of the superior court having jurisdiction over probate
 conservatorships shall not grant relief under this article if the court determines that the matter should be determined in a civil action, but shall instead transfer the matter to the general civil calendar of the superior court. The court need not abate a proceeding for relief pursuant to this article if the court determines that the civil action was filed for the purpose of delay.

(c) The death of the elder or dependent adult does not cause the court to lose jurisdiction of a claim for relief for abuse of that elder or dependent adult.

(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) and subdivision (e), after the death of the elder or dependent adult, the right to commence or maintain an action shall pass to the personal representative of the decedent. If there is no personal representative, the right to commence or maintain an action shall pass to any of the following,
 if the requirements of Section 377.32 of the Code of Civil Procedure are met:

(A) An intestate heir whose interest is affected by the action.

(B) The decedent’s successor in interest, as defined in Section 377.11 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(C) An interested person, as defined in Section 48 of the Probate Code, as limited in this subparagraph. As used in this subparagraph, “an interested person” does not include a creditor or a person who has a claim against the estate and who is not an heir or beneficiary of the decedent’s estate.

(2) If the personal representative refuses to commence or maintain an action or if the personal representative’s family or an affiliate, as those terms are defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1064 of the Probate Code,
 is alleged to have committed abuse of the elder or dependent adult, the persons described in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) shall have standing to commence or maintain an action for elder abuse. This paragraph does not require the court to resolve the merits of an elder abuse action for purposes of finding that a plaintiff who meets the qualifications of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) has standing to commence or maintain such an action.

(e) If two or more persons who are either described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or a personal representative claim to have standing to commence or maintain an action for elder abuse, upon petition or motion, the court in which the action or proceeding is pending, may make any order concerning the parties that is appropriate to ensure the proper administration of justice in the case pursuant to Section 377.33 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(f) This section does not affect the applicable statute of limitations for commencing an action for relief for abuse of an elderly or dependent adult.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 249.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.5.

(a) Where it is proven by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant is liable for financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30, in addition to compensatory damages and all other remedies otherwise provided by law, the court shall award to the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The term “costs” includes, but is not limited to, reasonable fees for the services of a conservator, if any, devoted to the litigation of a claim brought under this article.

(b) Where it is proven by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant is liable for financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30, and where it is proven by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant has been guilty of recklessness,
 oppression, fraud, or malice in the commission of the abuse, in addition to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs set forth in subdivision (a), compensatory damages, and all other remedies otherwise provided by law, the limitations imposed by Section 377.34 of the Code of Civil Procedure on the damages recoverable shall not apply.

(c) The standards set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code regarding the imposition of punitive damages on an employer based upon the acts of an employee shall be satisfied before any punitive damages may be imposed against an employer found liable for financial abuse as defined in Section 15610.30. This subdivision shall not apply to the recovery of compensatory damages or attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the award of punitive damages under Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(e) Any money judgment in an action under this section shall include a statement that the damages are awarded based on a claim for financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult, as defined in Section 15610.30. If only part of the judgment is based on that claim, the judgment shall specify what amount was awarded on that basis.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 64, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 336.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.6.

A person or entity that takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains, or assists in taking, secreting, appropriating, obtaining, or retaining the real or personal property of an elder or dependent adult when the elder or dependent adult lacks capacity pursuant to Section 812 of the Probate Code, or is of unsound mind, but not entirely without understanding, pursuant to Section 39 of the Civil Code, shall, upon demand by the elder or dependent adult or a representative of the elder or dependent adult, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 15610.30, return
 the property and if that person or entity fails to return the property, the elder or dependent adult shall be entitled to the remedies provided by Section 15657.5, including attorney’s fees and costs. This section shall not apply to any agreement entered into by an elder or dependent adult when the elder or dependent adult had capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 475, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.7.

An action for damages pursuant to Sections 15657.5 and 15657.6 for financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult, as defined in Section 15610.30, shall be commenced within four years after the plaintiff discovers or, through the exercise of reasonable diligence, should have discovered, the facts constituting the financial abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 475, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.8.

(a) An agreement to settle a civil action for physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, neglect, as defined in Section 15610.57, or financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30, of an elder or dependent adult shall not include any of the following provisions, whether the agreement is made before or after filing the action:

(1) A provision that prohibits any party to the dispute from contacting or cooperating with the county adult protective services agency, the local law enforcement agency, the long-term care ombudsman, the California Department of Aging, the Department of Justice, the Licensing and Certification Division of the State Department of Public Health, the
 State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, a licensing or regulatory agency that has jurisdiction over the license or certification of the defendant, any other governmental entity, a protection and advocacy agency, as defined in Section 4900, or the defendant’s current employer if the defendant’s job responsibilities include contact with elders, dependent adults, or children, provided that the party contacting or cooperating with one of these entities had a good faith belief that the information he or she provided is relevant to the concerns, duties, or obligations of that entity.

(2) A provision that prohibits any party to the dispute from filing a complaint with, or reporting any violation of law to, the county adult protective services agency, the local law enforcement agency, the
 long-term care ombudsman, the California Department of Aging, the Department of Justice, the Licensing and Certification Division of the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, a licensing or regulatory agency that has jurisdiction over the license or certification of the defendant, any other governmental entity, a protection and advocacy agency, as defined in Section 4900, or the defendant’s current employer if the defendant’s job responsibilities include contact with elders, dependent adults, or children.

(3) A provision that requires any party to the dispute to withdraw a complaint he or she has filed with, or a violation he or she has reported to, the county adult protective services agency, the local law enforcement agency, the long-term care ombudsman, the California
 Department of Aging, the Department of Justice, the Licensing and Certification Division of the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, a licensing or regulatory agency that has jurisdiction over the license or certification of the defendant, any other governmental entity, a protection and advocacy agency, as defined in Section 4900, or the defendant’s current employer if the defendant’s job responsibilities include contact with elders, dependent adults, or children.

(b) A provision described in subdivision (a) is void as against public policy.

(c) This section shall apply only to an agreement entered on or after January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 40.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reporting Forms [15658. - 15658.]

15658.

(a) A written abuse report, as required by this chapter, shall be submitted in one of the following ways:

(1) On a form adopted by the State Department of Social Services after consultation with representatives of the various law enforcement agencies, the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, the division, professional medical and nursing agencies, hospital associations, and county welfare departments. These reporting forms shall be distributed by the county adult protective services agencies and the long-term care ombudsman programs. This reporting form may also be used for documenting the telephone
 report of a known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult by the county adult protective services agency, local ombudsman program, and local law enforcement agencies.

(2) Through a confidential internet reporting tool, if the county or long-term care ombudsman program chooses to implement such a system. This internet reporting tool shall be developed and implemented in a manner that ensures the confidentiality and security of all information contained in the reports, pursuant to the confidentiality standards set forth in Sections 10850, 15633, and 15633.5.

(A) A county or long-term care ombudsman program that chooses to implement this system shall report to the Assembly Committee on Aging and Long-Term Care, the Assembly Committee on Human Services,
 the Senate Committee on Human Services, the Assembly Committee on Public Safety, and the Senate Committee on Public Safety one year after full implementation. The report shall include changes in the number of mandated reporters reporting through the confidential internet reporting tool, changes in the number of abandoned calls, and any other quantitative or qualitative data that indicate the success, or lack thereof, in employing a confidential internet reporting tool to better protect the safety and financial security of elder and dependent adults.

(B) Information sent and received through the confidential internet reporting tool shall be used only for its intended purpose and shall be subject to the same confidentiality and privacy requirements that govern nonelectronic transmission of the same information, and that are set
 forth in Sections 10850, 15633, and 15633.5.

(b) The form required by this section and the confidential internet reporting tool, if implemented, shall contain the following items:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and occupation of the person reporting.

(2) The name and address of the victim.

(3) The date, time, and place of the incident.

(4) Other details, including the reporter’s observations and beliefs concerning the incident.

(5) Any statement relating to the incident made by the victim.

(6) The name of any individuals believed to have knowledge of the incident.

(7) The name of the individuals believed to be responsible for the incident and their connection to the victim.

(c) (1) Each county adult protective services agency shall report to the State Department of Social Services monthly on the reports received pursuant to this chapter. The reports shall be made on forms adopted by the department. The information reported shall include, but shall not be limited to, the number of incidents of abuse, the number of persons abused, the type of abuse sustained, and the actions taken on the reports. For purposes of these reports, sexual abuse shall be reported separately from physical abuse.

(2) The county’s report to the department shall not include reports it receives from the long-term care ombudsman program pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall refer to the division monthly data summaries of the reports of elder and dependent adult abuse, neglect, abandonment, isolation, financial abuse, and other abuse it receives from county adult protective services agencies.

(d) Each long-term care ombudsman program shall report to the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman of the California Department of Aging monthly on the reports it receives pursuant to this chapter and shall send a copy to the county adult protective services agency. The Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall submit a summarized quarterly report to the
 department based on the monthly reports submitted by local long-term care ombudsman programs. The reports shall be on forms adopted by the department and the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. The information reported shall include, but shall not be limited to, the number of incidents of abuse, the numbers of persons abused, the type of abuse, and the actions taken on the reports. For purposes of these reports, sexual abuse shall be reported separately from physical abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 20.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Employee Statement [15659. - 15659.]

15659.

(a) Any person who enters into employment on or after January 1, 1995, as a care custodian, clergy member, health practitioner, or with an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency, prior to commencing his or her employment and as a prerequisite to that employment, shall sign a statement on a form that shall be provided by the prospective employer, to the effect that he or she has knowledge of Section 15630 and will comply with its provisions. The employer shall provide a copy of Section 15630 to the employee. The statement shall inform the employee that he or she is a mandated reporter and inform the employee of his or her reporting obligations under Section 15630. The signed statement shall be retained by the employer.

(b) Agencies or facilities that employ persons who were employed prior to January 1, 1995, and who are required to make reports pursuant to Section 15630, shall inform those persons of their responsibility to make reports by delivering to them a copy of the statement specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The cost of printing, distribution, and filing of these statements shall be borne by the employer.

(d) On and after January 1, 1995, when a person is issued a state license or certificate to engage in a profession or occupation the members of which are required to make a report pursuant to Section 15630, the state agency issuing the license or certificate shall send to the person a statement substantially similar to the one contained in subdivision (a) at the same time that it transmits to the person the document indicating licensure or certification.

(e) As an alternative to the procedure required by subdivision (d), a state agency may cause the required statement to be printed on all application forms for a license or certificate printed on or after January 1, 1995.

(f) The retention of statements required by subdivision (a), and the delivery of statements required by subdivision (b), shall be the full extent of the employer’s duty pursuant to this section. The failure of any employee or other person associated with the employer to report abuse of elders or dependent adults pursuant to Section 15630 or otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter shall be the sole responsibility of that person. The employer or facility shall incur no civil or other liability for the failure of these persons to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 12.7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Criminal Record Reporting [15660. - 15660.]

15660.

(a) The Department of Justice shall secure any criminal record of a person to determine whether the person has ever been convicted of a violation or attempted violation of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code, a sex offense against a minor, or of any felony that requires registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, or whether the person has been convicted or incarcerated within the last 10 years as the result of committing a violation or attempted violation of Section 273a or 273d, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 368, of the Penal Code, or as the result of committing a theft, robbery, burglary, or any felony, and shall provide a subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) An employer of the person requests the determination and submits fingerprints of the person to the Department of Justice. For purposes of this paragraph, “employer” includes, but is not limited to, an in-home supportive services recipient, as defined by Section 12302.2, an aged or disabled adult who is ineligible for benefits under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), who receives care by a person as described in paragraph (2), any recipient of personal care services under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Sections 14132.95 to 14132.97, inclusive, and any public authority or nonprofit consortium, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 12301.6.

(2) The person is unlicensed and provides nonmedical domestic or personal care to an aged or disabled adult in the adult’s own home.

(b) (1) If
 it is found that the person has ever been convicted of a violation or attempted violation of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code, a sex offense against a minor, or of any felony which requires registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, or that the person has been convicted or incarcerated within the last 10 years as the result of committing a violation or attempted violation of Section 273a or 273d, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 368, of the Penal Code, or as the result of committing a theft, robbery, burglary, or any felony, the Department of Justice shall notify the employer of that fact. If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the employer with a statement of that fact.

(2) Any employer may deny employment to any person who is the subject of a report under paragraph (1) when the report indicates that the person has committed any of the crimes identified in paragraph (1).

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any employer to hire any person who is the subject of a report under paragraph (1) when the report indicates that the person has not committed any of the crimes indicated in paragraph (1).

(c) (1) Fingerprints shall be on a card provided by the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining a set of fingerprints. The employer shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Justice. Within 30 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprints, the Department of Justice shall notify the employer of the criminal record information, as provided in this subdivision. If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the employer with a statement of that fact as soon as possible, but not later than 30 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprints. If
 new fingerprints are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, as soon as possible, but not later than 30 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprints, notify the employer that the fingerprints were illegible.

(2) Fingerprints may be taken by any local law enforcement officer or agency for purposes of paragraph (1).

(3) Counties shall notify any recipient of, or applicant for, in-home supportive services or personal care services under the Medi-Cal program, upon his or her application for in-home supportive services or personal care services or during his or her annual redetermination, or upon the recipient’s changing providers, that a criminal record check is available, and that the check can be performed by the Department of Justice.

(d) (1) The Department of
 Justice shall charge a fee to the employer to cover the costs of administering this section.

(2) (A) If the employer is an in-home supportive services recipient, as defined in Section 123202.2, a recipient of personal care services under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Sections 14132.95 to 14132.97, inclusive, or any public authority or nonprofit consortium as described in subdivision (a) of Section 12301.6, the fee shall be shared by the county and the state in the same ratio as described in Section 12306.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in clause (ii), the department shall, no later than January 1, 2009, implement subparagraph (A) through an all-county letter from the director.

(ii) No later than July 1, 2009, the department
 shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions listed in subparagraph (A).

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Justice charge a fee to cover its cost in providing services in accordance with this section to comply with the 30-calendar-day requirement for provision to the department of the criminal record information, as contained in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 217.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Paid Care Provider Requirements [15670. - 15675.]

15670.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Instances of elder and dependent adult abuse are on the rise, with the majority of the abuse occurring in the home of elderly or dependent person by noncertified caregivers.

(b) This state has a responsibility to protect these persons and to see that they are safeguarded from individuals who may pose a threat to their well-being.

(c) Criminal background checks of individuals who provide personal care services to elder and dependent adults, while not ending all occurrences of abuse, will serve as a factor in reducing some of these occurrences and giving senior citizens, dependent adults, and their families a sense of security that care is not being administered by individuals with dangerous criminal backgrounds.

(d) An effective background check program will be timely, affordable, and encompass caregivers in domestic and institutional settings.

(e) Individuals providing personal care services to elder and dependent adults should be well trained and appropriately compensated for their services to foster the creation of a long-term, professional work force.

(f) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that certified nurse assistants and certified home health aides shall be subject to a criminal background check.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social Services prepare a plan by January 1, 1996, to implement a program of criminal background checks for in-home care providers employed under the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3). The plan shall be made available to the Legislature upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1246, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15671.

(a) All initial certified nurse assistant and certified home health aide applicants, shall as a requirement for certification, undergo a criminal background check pursuant to Section 1338.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Nurse assistants certified prior to July 1, 1998, shall, as a condition of renewal of their certificates, undergo a criminal background check pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1337.6 and Section 1338.5 of the Health and Safety Code. Commencing July 1, 1998, pursuant to Section 1338.5 of the Health and Safety Code, nurse assistant applicants whose applications were submitted on or after July 1, 1998, shall undergo a criminal background check.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 558, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15673.

Home health aides certified prior to July 1, 1998, shall, as a condition of renewal of their certificates, undergo a criminal background check pursuant to Section 1736.6 of the Health and Safety Code. Commencing July 1, 1998, pursuant to Section 1736.6 of the Health and Safety Code, home health aide applicants whose applications are submitted on or after July 1, 1998, shall undergo a criminal background check.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 558, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15675.

(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the Department of Justice shall make available to the State Department of Health Services, at no cost, access to the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System as established pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 15150) of Part 6 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) As an alternative to the requirement of subdivision (a), the Department of Justice and the State Department of Health Services may negotiate and enter into a contract that specifies the method and terms upon which the cost of the Department of Justice to access the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System for purposes of the State Department of Health Services are allocated between the respective departments.

(2) During the operation of this contract, subdivision (a) shall not apply. However, subdivision (a) shall apply upon the termination, for any reason, of the contract and the contract shall not contain provisions to the contrary.

(3) The contract shall not contain provisions inconsistent with any law that prescribes the extent to which an applicant for licensure, a permit, or certification, or employees, or volunteers shall or shall not pay for a criminal record background check.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 558, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Protective Placements and Custody of Endangered Adults [15700. - 15705.40.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [15700. - 15700.]

15700.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Elder and dependent adults may be subjected to abuse, neglect, or abandonment, and that this state has a responsibility to protect those persons.

(2) Most elder and dependent adults who are at greatest risk of abuse, neglect, or abandonment by their families or caretakers, suffer physical impairments and other poor health that place them in a dependent and vulnerable position.

(3) A significant number of these persons have developmental disabilities and that mental and verbal limitations often leave them vulnerable to abuse and incapable of asking for help and protection.

(4) In cases of severe elder and dependent adult abuse or neglect, endangered adults are often placed in situations that pose an immediate risk of serious injury or death.

(5) In cases of severe elder and dependent adult abuse or neglect, endangered adults are frequently deprived of their personal autonomy and dignity by their abusers, thus preventing them from acting on their own needs or desires to free themselves from serious, and even life-threatening, abuse or neglect.

(6) Due to limited resources, court delays, and limitations of existing law, authorities are often unable to intervene in time to prevent victims of abuse and neglect from being seriously injured or killed.

(7) These limitations have left endangered adults, or elder and dependent adults subject to avoidable pain, suffering, and death, and has resulted in the expenditure of public funds of the treatment of major injuries and health conditions that could have been avoided with proper and timely intervention.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to enhance the protection of elderly persons and dependent adults by providing a mechanism for temporary emergency protective custody of elderly or dependent adults who are suspected victims of abuse or neglect, and who are found to be in a situation that poses an immediate risk of serious injury or death, and when no other means are available to mitigate the risk to the elderly or dependent adult.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [15701. - 15701.4.]

15701.

The definitions contained in this article and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15701.05.

“Appropriate temporary residence” means any of the following:

(a) A home or dwelling belonging to a member of the endangered adult’s family or next of kin, if it would not constitute a risk to the endangered or dependent adult.

(b) An adult residential care facility or residential care facility for the elderly designated by the county as an emergency shelter and that is licensed by the State of California to deal with the needs of elder or dependent adults.

(c) A 24-hour health facility, as designated by Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Any other home, dwelling, or congregate care unit that meets the needs of the adult.

(e) This chapter shall not be used to circumvent or supplant the involuntary detention and evaluation process provided for pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5150) of Part 1 of Division 5. A person shall not be deemed an “endangered adult” for the sole reason that the person voluntarily relies on treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone, in lieu of medical treatment.
